Utah statutes.
16-16-512.   Determination of voting power of patron member.

(1)  The organic rules may allocate voting power among patron members on the basis of one or a combination of the following:

(a)  one member, one vote;

(b)  use or patronage;

(c)  equity; or

(d)  if a patron member is a cooperative, the number of its patron members.

(2)  The organic rules may provide for the allocation of patron member voting power by districts or class, or any combination thereof.

